Missouri, session 2026, HB2863.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 456.4-420, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 456.4-420, to read as follows:
456.4-420. 1. If a trust instrument containing a no-contest clause is or has become
irrevocable, an interested person may file a petition to the court for [an interlocutory] a
determination whether a particular [motion, petition, or other] claim for relief by the
interested person would trigger application of the no-contest clause [or would otherwise
trigger a forfeiture] that is enforceable under applicable law and public policy.
2. The petition described in subsection 1 of this section shall be verified under oath.
The petition [may] shall be filed by an interested person either as a separate judicial
proceeding, or brought with other claims for relief in a single judicial proceeding, all in the
manner prescribed generally for such proceedings under this chapter. If a petition is joined
with other claims for relief, the interested person shall seek and the court shall enter its
order or judgment on the petition before proceeding any further with [any other claim for
relief joined therein] the matter. In ruling on such a petition, the court shall consider the text
of the clause, the context to the terms of the trust instrument as a whole, and in the context of
the verified factual allegations in the petition. No evidence beyond the pleadings and the trust
instrument shall be taken except as required to resolve an ambiguity in the no-contest clause.
3. An order or judgment [determining a petition] making a determination described
in subsection 1 of this section shall have the effect set forth in subsections 4 and 5 of this
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2863 2
section, and shall be subject to appeal as with other final judgments. [If the] An order that
disposes of fewer than all claims for relief in a [judicial] proceeding[, that order] under this
sectionis subject to [interlocutory] immediateappeal in accordance with the applicable rules
for taking such an appeal. If an [interlocutory] appeal is taken, the court may stay the pending
judicial proceeding until final disposition of said appeal on such terms and conditions as the
court deems reasonable and proper under the circumstances. A final ruling on the
applicability of a no-contest clause shall not preclude any later filing and adjudication of other
claims related to the trust.
4. An order or judgment, in whole or in part, on a petition described in subsection 1 of
this section shall result in the no-contest clause being enforceable to the extent of the court's
ruling, and shall govern application of the no-contest clause to the extent that the interested
person then proceeds forward with the claims described therein. In the event such an
[interlocutory] order or judgment is vacated, reversed, or otherwise modified on appeal, no
interested person shall be prejudiced by any reliance, through action, inaction, or otherwise,
on the order or judgment prior to final disposition of the appeal.
5. An order or judgment shall have effect [only] as to the claims, specific trust terms,
and factual basis recited in the petition and shall relate to all actions taken by all parties in
the lawsuit under the rules of civil procedure and this chapter. If claims are later filed or
amended that are materially different than those upon which the order or judgment is based,
then to the extent such new claims are raised, the party in whose favor the order or judgment
was entered shall have no protection from enforcement of the no-contest clause otherwise
afforded by the order and judgment entered under this section.
6. For purposes of this section, a "no-contest clause" shall mean a provision in a trust
instrument purporting to rescind a donative transfer to, or a fiduciary appointment of, any
person, or that otherwise effects a forfeiture of some or all of an interested person's beneficial
interest in a trust estate as a result of some action taken by the beneficiary. This definition
shall not be construed in any way as determining whether a no-contest clause is enforceable
under applicable law and public policy in a particular factual situation. As used in this
section, the term "no-contest clause" shall also mean an "in terrorem clause".
7. A no-contest clause is not enforceable against an interested person in[, but not
limited to,] the following circumstances:
(1) Filing a motion, petition, or other claim for relief objecting to the jurisdiction or
venue of the court over a proceeding concerning a trust, or over any person joined, or
attempted to be joined, in such a proceeding;
(2) Filing a motion, petition, or other claim for relief concerning an accounting,
report, or notice that has or should have been made by a trustee, provided the interested

HB 2863 3
person otherwise has standing to do so under applicable law, including, but not limited to,
section 456.6-603;
(3) Filing a motion, petition, or other claim for relief under chapter 475 concerning
the appointment of a guardian or conservator for the settlor;
(4) Filing a motion, petition, or other claim for relief under chapter 404 concerning
the settlor;
(5) Disclosure to any person of information concerning a trust instrument or that is
relevant to a proceeding before the court concerning the trust instrument or property of the
trust estate, unless such disclosure is otherwise prohibited by law;
(6) Filing a motion, pleading, or other claim for relief seeking approval of a
nonjudicial settlement agreement concerning a trust instrument, as set forth in section 456.1-
111;
(7) [To the extent] Filing a petition under [subsection 1 of] this section, provided the
petition is limited to the [procedure and purpose] procedures and purposes described
[therein] herein;
(8) Participation in a lawsuit consistent with the rules of civil procedure by any
interested person if the interested person has not asserted any affirmative claim for
relief;
(9) As to the interested persons to an action to the extent the court determines
that the application of the no-contest clause is void or unenforceable as against the
public policy of this state;
(10) The scope of the no-contest clause does not include the factual allegations of
the petition as the factual allegations apply to the specific terms of the trust; and
(11) A no-contest clause that seeks to cause a forfeiture against a beneficiary
challenging a trust term that would otherwise be prohibited under subsection 2 of
section 456.1-105 or section 456.10-1008.
8. An interested person who does not seek a determination in accordance with
the provisions of this section is not thereafter prohibited in any manner from
challenging the validity or application of a no-contest clause in a proceeding without the
protections afforded by this section.
[8.] 9. In any proceeding brought under this section, the court may award costs,
expenses, and attorneys' fees to any party, as provided in section 456.10-1004.
✔